New York, session 2025-2026, A8072.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Clause 6 of subparagraph (ii) of the opening paragraph of 2 section 1210 of the tax law, as amended by chapter 266 of the laws of 3 2023, is amended to read as follows: 4 (6) the city of Oswego is hereby further authorized and empowered to 5 adopt and amend local laws, ordinances or resolutions imposing such 6 taxes at a rate which is one percent additional to the three percent 7 rate authorized above in this paragraph for such city for the period 8 beginning September first, two thousand four, and ending November thir- 9 tieth, two thousand [twenty-five] twenty-seven; 10 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD09802-01-5